812 . CHAPTER 30
BERKELEY, 1969 The People’s Park controversy at the University of California at Berkeley turned the campus and the town into something close to a war zone. In this photograph, National Guardsmen with fixed bayonets stand in the way of a planned march to protest the closing of People's Park on May 30, 1969, more than two weeks after they first arrived to keep peace in Berkeley. (© AP Images)
disdain for traditional speech and decorum. Also central to the counterculture, as it became known, were drugs: marijuana-which after 1966 became almost as common a youthful diversion as beer-and the less widespread but still substantial use of other, more potent hallucinogens, such as LSD.
There was also a new, more permissive view of sexual behavior-the beginnings of what came to be known as a "sexual revolution/' To some degree, the emergence of relaxed approaches to sexuality was a result less of the counterculture than of the new accessibility of effective contraceptives, most notably the birth-control pill and, after 1973, legalized abortion. But the new sexuality also reflected the counterculture's belief that individuals should strive for release from inhibitions and give vent to their instincts and desires.
The counterculture challenged the structure of modern American society, attacking its banality, hollowness, artificiality, materialism, and isolation from nature. The most committed Haight	adherents of the counterculture-the hip-
Ashbury pies, wh° came to dominate the Haight-Ashbury neighborhood of San Francisco and other places, and the social dropouts, some of whom retreated to rural communes-rejected modern society and attempted to find refuge in a simpler, more "natural” existence.
The effects of the counterculture reached out to the larger
society and helped create a new set of social norms that many
young people (and some adults) chose to imitate. Long hair
ana irearnsn ciotning oecame tne oaage not omy oi nippies and radicals but of an entire generation as well. The use of marijuana, the freer attitudes toward sex, the iconoclastic (and sometimes obscene) language-all spread far beyond the realm of the true devotees of the counterculture.
Perhaps the most pervasive element of the new youth society was one that even the least radical members of the generation embraced: rock music. Rock 'n' roll, drawn in part from African American music, first achieved wide popularity in the 1950s, on the strength of such early performers as Buddy Holly and, above all, Elvis Presley. Early in the 1960s, its influence spread, largely as a result of the phenomenal popularity of the
Growing Beatles, the English group whose first visit Influence of	the United States in 1964 created a
Rock ’n’ Roll remarkable sensation, "Beatlemania.” For a time, most rock musicians-like most popu-
lar musicians before them—concentrated largely on uncontro-versial, romantic themes. By the late 1960s, however, rock had begun to reflect many of the new iconoclastic values of its time. The Beatles, for example, abandoned their once simple and seemingly innocent style for a new, experimental, even mystical approach that reflected the growing popular fascination with drugs and Eastern religions. Other groups, such as the Rolling Stones, turned even more openly to themes of anger, frustration, and rebelliousness. Rock’s driving rhythms, its sensuality, its often harsh and angry tone-all made it an
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 813 WOODSTOCK
In the summer of 1969, more than 400,000 people gathered for a rock concert on a farm near Woodstock, New York. Despite mostly terrible weather, the gathering was remarkably peaceful—sparking talk among some enthusiasts of the new youth culture about the "Woodstock nation." (© Shelly Rustin/Black Star) appropriate vehicle for expressing the themes of the social and political unrest of the late 1960s. A powerful symbol of the fusion of rock music and the counterculture was the great music festival at Woodstock, New York, in the summer of 1969. (See "Patterns of Popular Culture/ pp. 810-811.)
THE MOBILIZATION
OF MINORITIES
The growth of African American protest, the New Left, and the counterculture encouraged other minorities to assert themselves and demand redress of their grievances. For Native Americans, Hispanic Americans, gay men and women, and minorities, the late 1960s and the 1970s were a time of growing self-expression and political activism.
Seeds of Indian Militancy
Tew minorities had deeper or more justifiable grievances
against the prevailing culture than American Indians-or Native
Americans, as some began to call themselves in the 1960s.
Indians were the least prosperous, least healthy, and least stable group in the nation. They were also one of the smallest,
Native	constituting less than 1 percent of the pop-
American	ulation. Average annual family income for
Grievances Indians was $ 1,000 less than that for blacks.
The Native American unemployment rate was ten times the national rate. Joblessness was particularly high on the reservations, where nearly half the Indians lived. But even most Indians living in cities suffered from their limited education and training and could find only menial jobs. Life expectancy among Indians was some twenty years less than the national average. Suicides among Indian youths were a hundred times more frequent than among white youths. And while black Americans attracted the attention (for good or for ill) of many whites, Indians for many years remained
largely ignored.
For much of the postwar era, particularly after the resignation of John Collier as commissioner of Indian Affairs in 1946, federal policy toward the tribes moved toward incorporating Indians into mainstream American society. (This policy was similar to failed "assimilation” efforts in the late nineteenth century.) Two laws passed in 1953 established what became known as "termination.” Through termination,
814 . CHAPTER 30
ABORIGINAL TERRITORIES AND MODERN RESERVATIONS OF WESTERN INDIAN TRIBES
This map shows the rough distribution of the Native American population in the western United States before the establishment of reservations by the federal government in the nineteenth century. The large shaded regions in colors other than purple represent the areas in which the various tribes were dominant a century and more ago. The purple shaded areas show the much smaller areas set aside for them as reservations after the Indian wars of the late nineteenth century. • What impact did life on the reservations have on the rise of Indian activism in the 1960s and 1970s? the federal government withdrew all official recognition of the tribes as legal entities, administratively separate from state governments, and made them subject to the same local jurisdictions as white residents. At the same time, the government encouraged Indians to assimilate into the larger society and worked to funnel Native Americans into cities, where, presumably, they would adapt to the white world and lose their cultural distinctiveness.
To some degree, the termination and assimilation policies achieved their objectives. The tribes grew weaker, and many Native Americans adapted to life in the cities became less able to fend off white influence. On the whole, however, the new Failure of policies were a disaster for the tribes and a "Termination” failure for the reformers who had promoted them. Termination led to widespread corruption and abuse. And Indians fought so bitterly against it
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 815 THE OCCUPATION OF ALCATRAZ
Alcatraz, an island in San Francisco Bay, once housed a large federal prison that by the late 1960s had been abandoned. In 1969, a group of Indian activists occupied the island and claimed it as Indian land—precipitating a long standoff with authorities. (© AP Images) that in 1958 the Eisenhower administration barred further "terminations” without the consent of the affected tribes. In the meantime, the struggle against termination had mobilized a new generation of Indian militants and had breathed life into the principal Native American organization, the National Congress of American Indians (NCAI), created in 1944. The new militancy also benefited from the rapid increase in the Indian population, which was growing much faster than that of the rest of the nation (nearly doubling between 1950 and 1970, to a total of about 800,000).
The Indian Civil Rights Movement
In 1961, more than 400 members of 67 tribes gathered in Chicago to discuss ways of bringing all Indians together in an effort to redress common wrongs. The manifesto they issued, the Declaration of Indian Purpose, stressed the "right to choose our own way of life.” One result of the movement was a gradual change in the way popular culture depicted Indians. By the 1970s, almost no films or television westerns any longer portrayed Indians as brutal savages attacking peaceful white people. And Indian activists even persuaded some white institutions to abandon what they considered demeaning references to them; Dartmouth College, for example, ceased referring to its athletic teams as the "Indians.” In 1968, a group
AIM	°f y°un8 militant Indians established the
American Indian Movement (AIM), which drew its greatest support from those Indians who lived in urban areas but soon established a significant presence on the
reservations as well.
The new activism had some immediate political results. In
1968, Congress passed the Indian Civil Rights Act, which
recognized the legitimacy of tribal laws within the reserva-
tions. But leaders of AIM and other insurgent groups were not
satisfied and turned increasingly to direct action. In 1968,
Indian fishermen clashed with Washington State officials on the Columbia River and in Puget Sound, where Indians claimed that treaties gave them the exclusive right to fish. The following year, members of several tribes made a symbolic protest by occupying the abandoned federal prison on Alcatraz Island in San Francisco Bay and claiming the site "by right of discovery.”
In response to the growing pressure, the Nixon administration appointed a Mohawk-Sioux to the position of commissioner of Indian Affairs in 1969; and in 1970, the president promised both increased tribal self-determination and an increase in federal aid. But the protests continued. In November 1972, nearly a thousand demonstrators, most of them Sioux, forcibly occupied the building of the Bureau of Indian Affairs in Washington, D.C., for six days.
A more celebrated protest occurred in February 1973 at Wounded Knee, South Dakota, the site of the 1890 massacre of Sioux by federal troops. Members of AIM seized and occupied the town of Wounded Knee for two months, demanding radical changes in the administration of the reserva-
tion and insisting that the government honor its long-forgotten treaty obligations. A brief clash between the occupiers and federal forces left one Indian dead and another wounded.
More immediately effective than these militant protests were the victories that various tribes were achieving in the federal courts. In United States v. Wheeler (1978), the Supreme Court confirmed that tribes had independent legal standing and could not be "terminated” by Congress. Other decisions ratified the authority of tribes to impose taxes on businesses within their reservations and to perform other sovereign functions. In 1985, the U.S. Supreme Court, in County of Oneida v. Oneida Indian Nation, supported Indian claims to 100,000 acres in upstate New York that the Oneida tribe claimed by virtue of treaty rights long forgotten by whites.
Occupation of Wounded Knee
816 > CHAPTER 30
The Indian civil rights movement, like other civil rights movements of the same time, fell far short of winning full justice and equality for its constituents. To some Indians, the principal goal was to defend tribal autonomy, to protect the right of Indians (and, more to the point, individual tribal groups) to remain separate and distinct. To others, the goal was equality-to win for Indians a place in society equal to that of other groups of Americans. Because there was no single Indian culture or tradition in America, the movement never united all Indians.
Important
Legal
Victories
For all its limits, however, the Indian civil rights movement helped the tribes win a series of new legal rights and protections that gave them a stronger position
than they had enjoyed at any previous time in the twentieth century.
Latino Activism
Far more numerous than Indians were Latinos (or Hispanic Americans), the fastest-growing minority group in the United States. They were no more a single, cohesive group than the Indians were. Some-including the descendants of early Spanish settlers in New Mexico-had roots as deep in American history as those of any other group. Others were men and women who had immigrated since World War II.
Large numbers of Puerto Ricans had migrated to eastern cities, particularly New York City. South Florida's substantial Cuban population began with a wave of middle-class refugees fleeing the Castro regime in the early 1960s, followed by a second, much poorer wave of Cuban immigrants in 1980-the so-called Marielitos, named for the port from which they left Cuba. Later in the 1980s, large numbers of immigrants (both legal and illegal) began to arrive from the troubled nations of Central and South America-from Guatemala, Nicaragua, El Salvador, Peru, and others. But the most numerous and important Latino group in the United States was Mexican Americans.
During World War II, large numbers of Mexican Americans had entered the country in response to the labor shortage, and many had remained in the cities of the Southwest and the Pacific Coast. After the war, when the legal agreements that had allowed Mexican contract workers to enter the country expired, large numbers of immigrants continued to move to the United States illegally. In 1953, the government launched what it called Operation Wetback to deport the illegals, but the effort failed to stem the flow of new arrivals. By 1960, there were substantial Mexican American neighborhoods (barrios) in American cities from El Paso to Detroit. The largest (with more than 500,000 people, according to census figures) was in Los Angeles, which had a bigger Mexican population than any other place except Mexico City.
But the greatest expansion in the Mexican American popu-
lation was yet to come. In 1960, the census
reported slightly more than 3 million
Latinos living in the United States (the
Surging
Latino
Immigration
great majority of them Mexican Americans). By 1970, that number had grown to 9 million, and by 2009 to 48 million. Since there was also an uncounted but very large number of illegal immigrants in those years, the real number was undoubtedly larger.
By the late 1960s, Mexican Americans were one of the largest population groups in the West-outnumbering African Americans-and had established communities in most other parts of the nation as well. They were also among the most urbanized groups in the population; almost 90 percent lived and worked in cities. Many of them (particularly members of the older and more assimilated families of Mexican descent) were affluent and successful. Wealthy Cubans in Miami filled influential positions in the professions and local government; in the Southwest, Mexican Americans elected their own leaders to seats in Congress and to governorships.
But most newly arrived Mexican Americans and other Hispanics were less well educated than either "Anglo” or African Americans and hence less well prepared for high-paying jobs. Some of them found good industrial jobs in unionized industries, and some Mexican Americans became important labor organizers in the AFL-CIO. But many more (including most illegal immigrants) worked in low-paying service jobs, with few if any benefits and no job security.
Partly because of language barriers, partly because the family-centered culture of many Latino communities discouraged effective organization, and partly because of discriminate	„ tion, Mexican Americans and other
Chicano	...
Activism Hispanics were slower to develop political
........... 1' influence than other minorities. But some
did respond to the highly charged climate of the 1960s by strengthening their ethnic identification and organizing for political and economic power. Young Mexican American activists began to call themselves "Chicanos” (once a term of derision used by whites) as a way of emphasizing the shared culture of Spanish-speaking Americans. Some Chicanos advocated a form of nationalism not unlike the ideas of black power advocates. The Texas leaders of La Raza Unida, a Chicano political party in the Southwest, called for the creation of an autonomous Mexican American state within a state; it demonstrated
significant strength at the polls in the 1970s.
One of the most visible efforts to organize Mexican Americans occurred in California, where an Arizona-born Latino farmworker, Cesar Chavez, created an effective union of itinerant farmworkers. In 1965, his United Farm Workers (UFW), a largely Mexican American organization, launched Cesar Chavez a Prolonged strike against growers to demand recognition of their union and increased wages and benefits. When employers resisted, Chavez enlisted the cooperation of college students, churches, and civil rights groups (including CORE and SNCC) and organized a nationwide boycott, first of table grapes and then of lettuce. In 1968, Chavez campaigned openly for Robert Kennedy. Two years later, he won a substantial victory when the growers of half of California's table grapes signed contracts
with his union.
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
♦ 817 KENNEDY AND CHAVEZ
Cesar Chavez, the magnetic leader of the largely Mexican American United Farm Workers, a union that represented mostly migrant workers, staged a hunger strike in 1968 to demand that its members receive better treatment by growers. Robert F. Kennedy, just beginning his campaign for the presidency, paid him a visit in Delano, California, to show his support. Chavez, who had by then been fasting for many weeks, looks visibly weak here. Kennedy's visit helped persuade him to end the fast. (Photo by Michael Rougier/© Time & Life Pictures/Getty images) Latino Americans were at the center of another controversy of the 1970s and beyond: the issue of bilingualism. It was a question that aroused the opposition not only of many whites but of some Hispanics as well. Supporters of bilingualism in education argued that non-English-speaking Americans were entitled to schooling in their own language, that otherwise they would be at a grave disadvantage in comparison with native English speakers. The U.S. Supreme Court confirmed the right of non-English-speaking students to schooling in their native language in 1974. Opponents cited not only the cost and difficulty of bilingualism but also the dangers it posed to students' ability to assimilate into the mainstream of American culture.
Gay Liberation
Another important liberation movement that made gains in
the 1960s was the effort by homosexuals to win political
and economic rights and, equally important, social accep-
tance. Homosexuality and lesbianism had been unacknowl-
edged realities throughout American history; not until many
years after their deaths did many Americans know, for example, that revered cultural figures such as Walt Whitman and Horatio Alger were homosexuals. But by the late 1960s, the liberating impulses that had affected other groups helped mobilize gay men and lesbians to fight for their own rights.
On June 27, 1969, police officers raided the Stonewall Inn, a gay bar in New York City’s Greenwich Village, and began arresting patrons simply for frequenting the place. The raid was not unusual; police had been harassing gay bars (and homosexual men and women) for years. riot”	The accumulated resentment of this long
history of assaults and humiliations caused the extraordinary response that summer night. Gay onlookers taunted the police, then attacked them. Someone started a blaze in the Stonewall Inn, almost trapping the policemen inside. Rioting continued throughout Greenwich Village (a center of New York’s gay community) through much of the
night.
The "Stonewall Riot” helped make the gay liberation movement-a movement that had been gaining strength since
818 . CHAPTER 30
THE QUILT
In the early years of gay liberation, the movement focused mostly on ending discrimination and harassment. By the 1990s, however, with the AIDS epidemic affecting large numbers of gay men, activists shifted much of their attention to pressing for a cure and to remembering those who had died. One of the most remarkable results of that effort was the AIDS Quilt. Friends and relatives of victims of the disease made individual patches in memory of those they had lost. Then, in many different cities, thousands of quilters would join their pieces to create a vast testament to bereavement and memory. The enormity of the project was most visible in October 1996, when hundreds of thousands of pieces of the quilt were laid out on the Mall in Washington, stretching from the Washington Monument to the Capitol.
(© Ron Edmunds/'AP Images)
at least the 1950s-a significant and highly public force. New organizations sprang up around the country. Public discussion and media coverage of homosexuality, long subject to an unofficial taboo, quickly and dramatically increased. Gay and lesbian activists had some success in challenging the longstanding assumption that homosexuality was "aberrant” behavior. They argued that no sexual preference was any more "normal” than another.
formed the outlook
Impact of the Gay Liberation Movement
Most of all, however, the gay liberation movement trans-of gay men and lesbians themselves. It helped them to "come out,” to express their preferences openly and unapolo-getically, and to demand from society a recognition that gay relationships
could be as significant and worthy of respect as heterosexual ones. Even the ravages of the AIDS epidemic, which affected the gay community more disastrously than it affected any other group, failed to halt the growth of gay liberation. In many ways, it strengthened it.
By the early 1990s, gay men and lesbians were achieving some of the same milestones that other oppressed minorities had attained in earlier decades. Some openly gay politicians won election to public office. Universities were establishing gay and lesbian studies programs. And laws prohibiting discrimination on the basis of sexual preference were making slow, halting progress at the local level.
But gay liberation also produced a powerful backlash. This became especially evident in 1993, when President Bill Clinton's effort to lift the ban on gays and lesbians serving in the military met a storm of criticism from members of Congress and from within the military itself. The backlash proved so strong that the administration retreated from its position and settled for a weak compromise ("Don’t ask, don’t tell”) by which the military would not ask recruits about their sexual preferences, while those who enlisted in the military were expected not to reveal them.
A decade later, issues involving gays and lesbians reached a high level of intensity again, sparked in part by the efforts of several cities and states to legalize same-sex marriage. President George W. Bush proposed a constitutional amendment to ban same-sex marriage, and the issue became a major element of Republican election campaigns. Many states put referenda on their ballots banning gay marriage, and most such referenda were decisively approved by the voters.
By 2014, the federal government, 17 states, and the District of Columbia authorized same-sex marriage. In 2013, the Supreme Court bolstered the rights of same-sex couples when it ruled, in United States v. Windsor, that restricting the definition of marriage to include only heterosexual couples was unconstitutional. The ruling extended on the federal level the same rights
enjoyed by married heterosexuals to same-sex couples. The ruling left intact any state laws prohibiting same-sex marriage. Also in 2013, Congress passed the Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell Repeal Act, making it possible for gay people to serve openly in the military.
THE NEW FEMINISM
American women constitute a slight majority of the population. But during the 1960s and 1970s, many women began to identify with minority groups and to demand a liberation of their own. As a result, the role of women in American life changed more dramatically than that of any other group in the nation.
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 819 The Rebirth
Feminism had been a weak and often-embattled force in American life for more than forty years after the adoption of the woman suffrage amendment in 1920. Yet in the 1960s and 1970s, it evolved very quickly from relative obscurity to one of the most powerful social movements in American history.
The 1963 publication of Betty Friedan’s The Feminine
Mystique is often cited as an important early event of con-
_	„	temporary women’s liberation. Friedan, a
The Feminine	.	,
Mystique magazine journalist, had traveled around the country interviewing the women who had graduated with her from Smith College in 1942. Most of these women were living out the dream that postwar American society had created for them: they were affluent wives and mothers living in comfortable suburbs. And yet many of them were deeply frustrated and unhappy. The suburbs, Friedan claimed, had become a "comfortable concentration camp/’ providing the women who inhabited them with no outlets for their intelligence, talent, and education. The "feminine mystique,” she wrote, was responsible for "burying millions of women alive.” By chronicling their unhappiness and frustration, Friedan did not so much cause
workforce.
* What role did this growing participation in the paid workforce have on the rise of feminism in the 1960s and beyond?
the revival of feminism as help give voice to a movement that was already stirring.
By the time The Feminine Mystique appeared, John Kennedy had established the President’s Commission on the Status of Women; it brought national attention to sexual discrimination and helped create important networks of feminist activists who would lobby for legislative redress. Also in 1963, the Kennedy administration helped win passage of the Equal Pay Act, which barred the pervasive practice of paying women less than men for equal work. A year later, Congress incorporated into the Civil Rights Act of 1964 an amendment-Title VII-that extended to women many of the same legal protections against discrimination that were being extended to African Americans.
The events of the early 1960s helped expose a contradiction that had been developing for decades between the image of happy domesticity, what Friedan had called the "feminine mystique,” and the reality of women’s roles in America. The reality was that increasing numbers of women (including, by 1963, over a third of all married women) had already entered the workplace and were encountering widespread discrimination there; and that many other women were finding their domestic lives suffocating and frustrating.
In 1966, Friedan joined with other feminists to create the NOW	National Organization for Women (NOW),
Founded which soon became the nation’s largest and most influential feminist organization.
Like other movements for liberation, feminism drew much of its inspiration from the black struggle for freedom.
The new organization responded to the complaints of the women Friedan’s book had examined-affluent suburbanites with no outlet for their interests-by demanding greater educational opportunities for women and denouncing the domestic ideal and the traditional concept of marriage. But the heart of the movement, at least in the beginning, was directed toward the needs of women already in the workplace. NOW denounced the exclusion of women from professions, from politics, and from countless other areas of American life. It decried legal and economic discrimination, including the practice of paying women less than men for equal work (a practice the Equal Pay Act had not effectively eliminated). The organization called for "a fully equal partnership of the sexes, as part of the worldwide revolution of human rights.”
Women's Liberation
By the late 1960s, new and more radical feminist demands were also attracting a large following. The new feminists were mostly younger, the vanguard of the baby-boom generation. Many of them drew inspiration
New	from the New Left and the countercul-
Directions in ture. Some were involved in the civil the Women’s rights movement, others in the antiwar
Movement crusade. Many had found that even
820 ♦ CHAPTER 30
within those movements, they faced discrimination and exclusion or subordination to male leaders.
By the early 1970s, a significant change was visible in the tone and direction of the women’s movement. New books by younger feminists expressed a harsher critique of American society than Friedan had offered. Kate Millett’s Sexual Politics (1969) signaled the new direction by arguing that "every avenue of power within the society is entirely within male hands.” The answer to women’s problems, in other words, was not, as Friedan had suggested, for individual women to search for greater personal fulfillment; it was for women to band together to assault the male power structure. Shulamith Firestone’s The Dialectic of Sex (1970) was subtitled "The Case for Feminist Revolution.” By the early 1970s, large numbers of women were coming to see themselves as an exploited group organizing against oppression and developing a culture and communities of their own.
Expanding Achievements
By the early 1970s, the public and private achievements of the women’s movement were already substantial. In 1971, the
Political and Economic Success
government extended its affirmative action guidelines to include women-linking sexism with racism as an officially acknowledged social problem. In the meantime, women were making rapid progress in their efforts to move into the economic and political mainstream. The nation s major all-male educational institutions began to open their doors to women. (Princeton and Yale did so in 1969, and most other all-male colleges and universities soon followed.) Some women’s colleges, in the meantime, began accepting male students.
Women were also becoming an important force in business and the professions. Nearly half of all married women held jobs by the mid-1970s, and almost 90 percent of all women with college degrees worked. (By 2010, women constituted half the total workforce.) The two-career family, in
which both husband and wife maintained active professional lives, was becoming a widely accepted norm; many women were postponing marriage or motherhood for the sake of their careers. There were also important symbolic changes, such as the refusal of many women to adopt their husbands’ names when they married and the use of the term "Ms.” in place of
MARCHING FOR WOMEN’S RIGHTS
By the end of the 1960s, the struggle for individual rights—which the African American civil rinhto ( r na| consciousness-had inspired a broad range of movements. Perhaps the most important in the long run was the drive for women’s riohts which9	PUSh t0	"h'°
thousands of women joined this march through New York City. (© Werner Wolff/Black Star)	9	’ W3S 3 ready formidable in the summer of 1970, when
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 821 "Mrs.” or "Miss" to denote the irrelevance of a woman’s marital status in the public world. In politics, women were beginning to compete effectively with men for both elected and appointive positions. By 2010, considerable numbers of women were serving in both houses of Congress (including a Speaker of the House, Nancy Pelosi), in numerous federal cabinet positions (including three secretaries of state), as governors, and in many other positions. Ronald Reagan appointed the first female Supreme Court justice, Sandra Day O'Connor, in 1981; in 1993, Bill Clinton appointed the second, Ruth Bader Ginsburg; and Barack Obama appointed two women justices, Sonia Sotomayor and Elena Kagan in 2009 and 2010, respectively. In 1984, the Democratic Party chose Representative Geraldine Ferraro of New York as its vice presidential candidate, and in 2008, Hillary Clinton became a formidable candidate in the race for the Democratic presidential nomination. In academia, women were expanding their presence in traditional scholarly fields; they were also creating a field of their own-women’s studies, which in the 1980s and early 1990s was among the fastest-growing areas of American scholarship.
In professional athletics, women were beginning to compete with men both for attention and for an equal share of prize money. By the late 1970s, the federal government was pressuring colleges and universities to provide women with athletic programs equal to those available to men.
In 1972, Congress approved the Equal Rights Amendment to the Constitution, which some feminists had been promoting Failure of since the 1920s, and sent it to the states. For
to a	a while, ratification seemed almost certain.
ERA
By the late 1970s, however, the momentum behind the amendment had died. The ERA was in trouble not because of indifference but because of a rising chorus of objections to it from people (including many antifeminist women) who feared it would disrupt traditional social patterns. In 1982, the amendment died when the time allotted for its ratification expired.
The Abortion Controversy
A vital element of American feminism since the 1920s has been women’s effort to win greater control of their own sexual and reproductive lives. In its least controversial form, this impulse helped produce an increasing awareness in the 1960s and 1970s of the problems of rape, sexual abuse, and wife beating. There continued to be some controversy over the dissemination of contraceptives and birth-control information; but that issue, at least, seemed to have lost much of the explosive character it had had in the 1920s. A related issue, however, stimulated as much popular passion as any question of its time: abortion.
Abortion had once been legal in much of the United States, but by the beginning of the twentieth century it was banned by statute in most of the country and remained so into the R .	1960s (although many abortions continued
V’ WADE
to be performed quietly, and often danger- ously, out of sigh; of the law). But the womens movement
created strong new pressures on behalf of legalizing abortion.
Several states had abandoned restrictions on abortion by the end of the 1960s. And in 1973, the Supreme Court’s decision in Roe v. Wade, based on a relatively new theory of a constitutional "right to privacy," first recognized by the Court only a few years earlier in Griswold v. Connecticut (1965), invalidated all laws prohibiting abortion during the "first trimester”-the first three months of pregnancy. The decision would become the most controversial ruling of the century.
ENVIRONMENTALISM IN
A TURBULENT SOCIETY
Like feminism, environmentalism entered the 1960s with a long history and little public support. Also like feminism, environmentalism both profited from and transcended the turbulence of the era and emerged by the 1970s as a powerful and enduring force in American and global life.
The rise of this new movement was in part a result of the environmental degradation that had become increasingly evident in the advanced industrial society of the late twentieth century. It was a result, too, of the growth of the science of ecology, which provided environmentalists with new and powerful arguments. And it was a product of some of the countercultural movements of the time: movements that rejected aspects of the modern, industrial, consumer society and called for a return to a more "natural" existence.
The New Science of Ecology
Until the mid-twentieth century, most people who considered themselves environmentalists (or, to use the traditional term, conservationists) based their commitment on aesthetic or moral grounds: they wanted to preserve nature because it was too beautiful to despoil, or because it was a mark of divinity on the world. In the course of the twentieth century, however, scientists in the United States and other nations-drawing from earlier, relatively obscure scientific writings-began to create a new rationale for environmentalism. They called it "ecology."
Ecology is the science of the interrelatedness of the natural world. It rests on an assumption-as the American zoologist Stephen A. Forbes wrote as early as 1880-that "primeval nature . . . presents a settled harmony of interaction among organic groups," and that this harmony "is in strong
contrast with the many serious maladjustments of plants and animals found in countries occupied by man." Such problems as air and water pollution, the destruction of forests, the extinction of species, and toxic wastes are not, ecology teaches, separate, isolated problems. All elements of the earth’s environment are intimately and delicately linked. Damaging any one of those elements, therefore, risks damaging all the others.
A number of American scientists built on Forbes’s ideas in the early twentieth century, but perhaps the greatest early
Idea of an Interrelated World
822 > CHAPTER 30
RACHEL CARSON
Rachel Carson, who began her career as a marine biologist, wrote the world's best-selling book about the ocean environment in the 1950s. Carson's abiding love for the creatures of shore and surf led to her concern about the harm pesticides might do them. (© Bettmann/Corbis) contribution to popular knowledge of ecology came not from a scientist, but from the writer and naturalist Aldo Leopold. During a career in forest management, Leopold sought to apply the new scientific findings on ecology to his interactions with the natural world. And in 1949, he published a classic of environmental literature, The Sand County Almanac, in which he argued that humans have a responsibility to understand and maintain the balance of nature, that they should behave in the natural world according to a code that he called the "land ethic/’ By then, the science of ecology was spreading widely in the scientific community. Among the findings of ecologists were such now-common ideas as the "food chain,” the "ecosystem,” "biodiversity,” and "endangered species.”
The influence of these emerging ideas of ecology could be seen especially clearly in the sensational 1962 book by Rachel Carson, Silent Spring. Carson was a marine biologist who had become a successful science writer. In 1957, she received a letter from a friend reporting the deaths of songbirds in her yard after the area had been sprayed with the insecticide DDT-the chemical developed in the 1930s to kill mosquitoes. Carson began investigating the impact of DDT and discovered growing signs of danger. DDT was slowly being absorbed into the food chain through water and plants, and the animals who ate and drank them. It was killing some animals (especially birds and fish) and inhibiting the ability of others to reproduce. Carson wrote eloquently about the growing danger of a "silent spring,” in which birds would no longer sing and in which sickness and death would soon threaten large numbers of animals and, perhaps, people.
Silent Spring was an enormously influential book and had a direct, if delayed, influence on the decision to ban DDT in the United States in 1972. It was evidence of the growing power of environmentalism, and of the science of ecology, on public
policy and national culture. But Silent Spring was also a very controversial book that enraged the chemical industry. Critics of Carson attempted to suppress the book and, when that effort failed, to discredit its findings.
Between 1945 and 1960, the number of ecologists in the United States grew rapidly, and that number doubled again between 1960 and 1970. Funded by government agencies, by universities, by foundations, and eventually even by some corporations, ecological science gradually established itself as a significant field of its own. By the early twenty-first century, there were programs in and departments of
ecological science in major universities throughout the United States and in many other nations.
Much more than other scientists, however, ecologists tend to fuse their commitment to research with a commitment to publicizing their work and promoting responsible public action to deal with environmental crises.
Ecology’s
Postwar
Growth
Environmental Advocacy
Among the most important environmental organizations of the late twentieth and early twenty-first centuries were the Wilderness Society, the Sierra Club, the National Audubon Society, the Nature Conservancy, the National Wildlife Federation, and the National Parks and Conservation Association. All of these organizations predated the rise of modern ecological science, but all of them entered the twenty-first century reenergized and committed to the new concepts of environmentalism. They found allies among other not-for-profit organizations that had no previous experience with environmentalism but now chose to join the battle-among them such groups as the American Civil Liberties Union, the League of Women Voters, the National Council of Churches, and even the AFL-CIO.
Out of these organizations emerged a new generation of professional environmental activists able to contribute to the
New
Professional
Environmental
Activists
legal and political battles of the movement. Scientists provided the necessary data. Lawyers fought battles with government agencies and in the courts. Lobbyists used traditional techniques of political persuasion with legislators and other officials-knowing that
many corporations and other opponents of environmental efforts would be doing the same in opposition to their goals.
Perhaps most of all, these organizations learned how to mobilize public opinion on their behalf.
Environmental Degradation
Perhaps the greatest force behind environmentalism was the condition of the environment itself. By the 1960s, the damage
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 823 to the natural world from the dramatic economic growth of
the postwar era was becoming impossible to ignore. Water
pollution which had been a problem in some areas of the
Water and country for many decades-was becoming
Air Pollution so widespread that almost every major city was dealing with the unpleasant sight and odor, as well as the very real health risks, of polluted rivers and lakes. In Cleveland, Ohio, for example, the Cuyahoga River burst into flame from time to time beginning in the 1950s
from the petroleum waste being dumped into it.
Perhaps more alarming was the growing awareness that the
air itself was becoming unhealthy, that toxic fumes from factories and power plants and, most of all, automobiles were poisoning the atmosphere. Weather forecasts and official atmospheric information began to refer to "smog” levels—using a new word formed from a combination of "smoke” and "fog.” In some large cities-Los Angeles and Denver among them-smog became a perpetual fact of life, rising steadily through the day, blotting out the sun, and creating respiratory difficulties for many citizens.
Environmentalists also brought to public attention some longer-term dangers of unchecked industrial development: the rapid depletion of oil and other irreplaceable fossil fuels; the destruction of lakes and forests as a result of "acid rain” (rainfall polluted by chemical contaminants); the rapid destruction of vast rain forests, in Brazil and elsewhere, which limited the earth’s capacity to replenish its oxygen supply; the depletion of the ozone layer as a result of the release of chlorofluorocarbons into the atmosphere, which threatened to limit the earth’s protection from dangerous ultraviolet rays from the sun; and most alarming, global warming, which if unchecked would create dramatic changes in the earth’s climate and would threaten existing cities and settlements in coastal areas all over the world by causing a rise in ocean levels. Many of these claims became controversial, with skeptics arguing that environmentalists had not conclusively proven their cases. But most environmentalists-and many scientists-came to believe that the problems were real and deserving of immediate, urgent attention.
Earth Day and Beyond
On April 22, 1970, people all over the United States gathered in schools and universities, in churches and clubs, in parks and auditoriums, for the first "Earth
"Earth'day” Day” Ori§inally ProPosed bY Wisconsin senator Gaylord Nelson as a series of teach-ins on college campuses, Earth Day gradually took on a much larger life. Carefully managed by people who wanted to avoid associations with the radical left, it had an unthreatening quality that appealed to many people for whom antiwar demonstrations and civil rights rallies seemed threatening. According to some estimates, over 20 million Americans participated in some part of the Earth Day observances, which may have made it the largest single demonstration in the
nation’s history.
EARTH DAY, 1970
The first "Earth Day," April 22, 1970, was an important event in the development of the environmental movement. Conceived by Wisconsin senator Gaylord Nelson, Earth Day quickly gathered support in many areas of the United States and produced large demonstrations such as this one in New York City, where crowds surround a large banner portraying the earth crying out for help. (© Hulton Archive/Getty Images) The cautious, centrist character of Earth Day and related efforts to popularize environmentalism helped create a movement that had little of the divisiveness of other, more controversial causes. Gradually, environmentalism became more than simply a series of demonstrations and protests. It became part of the consciousness of the vast majority of Americans-absorbed into popular culture, built into primary and secondary education, endorsed by almost all politicians (even if many of them opposed some environmental goals).
It also became part of the fabric of public policy. In 1970, Congress passed and President Nixon signed the National Environmental Protection Act, which created a new agency-the Environmental Protection Agency-to enforce antipollution standards on businesses and consumers. The Clean Air Act,
also passed in 1970, and the Clean Water Act, passed in 1972, added tools to the government’s arsenal of weapons against environmental degradation.
EPA
Established

The End of Colonialism
WI	^6, less than a year after the close of World War II, the United States volun-
LJ IN
tarily ended its five-decade-old colonial control of the Philippines, which it had acquired as part of the spoils from the 1898 Spanish-American War. Philippine independence was only a small part of a dramatic change in the political structure of the world. The close of World War II marked not only the defeat of fascism in Germany, Italy, and Japan, but also the beginning of the end of the formal system of imperialism that European powers had maintained for centuries. Like most fundamental geopolitical changes, the drive for colonial independence was turbulent and often violent. Although its divestiture of the Philippines was relatively peaceful, the United States was not quite as ready to cede its military and economic presence in the region as it was to give up political responsibility over the islands. Philippine independence came with important caveats: the United States maintained control of its military bases there, forbade the Philippines to engage in any direct economic competition with the United States, and required the new Philippine government to revise its constitution to allow American interests free access to the nation's natural resources. In fact, many Filipinos argue that their nation only achieved full independence in 1991, after the Philippine Senate refused to ratify a treaty that would have extended the American lease on the Subic Bay Naval Base. A year later, the United States closed the base and left, marking the first time in 400 years that the Philippines (once a Spanish possession) were not home to a foreign military power.
Britain, whose imperial holdings were the vastest in the world, withdrew from most of its colonies after World War II—beginning in 1947 with India, its largest and most important colony. As often happened when colonial rule ended, suppressed conflicts in the native population quickly emerged—in the case of India, between Hindus and Muslims. The price of Indian independence was the partition of the country into India and Pakistan (and, several decades later, Bangladesh). A year later, Britain gave up its World War I mandate of Palestine, ceding the territory to the United Nations (and allowing for the creation of Israel), as well as many of its holdings in Southeast Asia. In 1982, Britain passed the Canada Act, effectively severing Canada from the United Kingdom and culminating a move toward full Canadian self-government. Finally, in 1997, Britain returned Hong Kong to the control of China, effectively bringing an end to the era of the British Empire.
The dissolution of the British Empire did not always proceed smoothly. The Suez Crisis of 1956 dealt a decisive blow to Britain's status as a major power in the Middle East. The efforts of Britain, France, and Israel to prevent Egypt from seizing the British-controlled Suez Canal, which ran through Egyptian territory, ended in a humiliating defeat. In 1982, a dispute over the tiny Falkland Islands (just
off the coast of Argentina) soon erupted into war between Britain and Argentina, which claimed the islands as its own. After the deaths of 258 British and 649 Argentine soldiers, Britain maintained its control of the Falklands, although Argentina continues to assert its right to the islands.
Despite these controversies, the dissolution of the British Empire proceeded relatively smoothly compared to the experience of the French. In late 1946, Vietnamese nationalists rose up against the French colonial government that controlled the region. The French effort to return to Vietnam culminated ultimately in the French defeat at Dien Bien Phu in 1954 and their subsequent withdrawal from Indochina. France also became embroiled in—and tried to suppress by force—other violent colonial uprisings, in Madagascar, Cameroon, and most notably Algeria. The Algerian War (1954-1962) was a particularly bloody and costly conflict, involving guerrilla warfare, torture, acts of terrorism, and, eventually, the collapse of the French Fourth Republic in 1958. Algeria ultimately won its independence, but the scars created by the long and ugly war were slow to heal.
The end of the colonial system had its greatest impact on Africa. European powers had carved up almost all of sub-Saharan Africa in the nineteenth century. But in the decades after World War II, almost all the African colonies won their independence even if not always easily. African nationalism, however, was troubled for decades by political instability and, in some countries, extreme poverty. Africa is currently home to 34 of the 48 poorest and 24 of the 32 least developed
NIXON, KISSINGER,
AND THE WAR
Richard Nixon assumed office in 1969 committed not only to restoring stability at home but also to creating a new and more stable order in the world. Central to his hopes was a resolution of the stalemate in Vietnam. Yet the new president felt no freer than his predecessor to abandon the American commitment there. He realized that the war was threatening both the nation’s domestic stability and its position in the world. But he feared that a precipitous retreat would destroy American honor and "credibility.” American involvement in Indochina continued for four more years, during which the war expanded in its geographic scope and its bloodiness.
VlETNAMIZATION
Despite Nixon’s own passionate interest in international affairs, he brought with him into government a man who ultimately
Henry	seemed to overshadow him in the conduct
Kissinger °f diplomacy: Henry Kissinger, a Harvard professor whom the president appointed as his national security adviser. Kissinger quickly established dominance over the secretary of state, William Rogers, and the secretary of defense, Melvin Laird, who were both more experienced in public life than Kissinger was. That was in part a result of Nixon’s passion for concentrating decision making in the White House. But Kissinger’s keen intelligence, bureaucratic skills, and success in handling the press were at least equally important. Together, Nixon and Kissinger set out to
find an acceptable solution to the stalemate in Vietnam.
824
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 825 countries in the world, in no small part a result of the lingering shadow cast by centuries of colonial exploitation of the continent.
The most recent epicenter of independence movements has been in the lands that used to comprise the former Soviet Union. A long and costly war in Afghanistan began in the 1970s as the Soviet Union struggled to retain control of the nation in the face of powerful local insurgencies. The war was one of the principal factors in the unraveling of the Soviet Empire that began in 1991. Many of the former Soviet republics—which considered themselves colonies of Russia-soon separated from Russia and became independent nations in their own right. Even after the dissolution of the Soviet Union, Russia continues to deal with the problems of empire. A vicious conflict with Chechnya, an Islamic area of Russia insisting on independence, has created terror and instability for years. In 2014, Russia reclaimed Crimea, which since the collapse of the Soviet Union had been a part of Ukraine. This action threatened to heighten tensions between Russia and the West to levels not seen since the Cold War.
The end of colonialism marked the end to an imperial system that was based on the assumption of European (and American) superiority over non-Western peoples. But if formal colonialism came to an end in the post-World War II era, other aspects of imperialism did not. Many former colonies still struggle with the indirect exercise of power, especially economic power, that wealthy Western nations continue to exert over much of the nonindustrialized world. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	How did the experience of World War II contribute to the end of colonialism?
2.	Why was the end of colonialism so often accompanied by violence?
3.	What have been the effects of colonialism—and the end of colonialism—on Africa? Why have the effects been so pronounced on that continent, more so than in other areas of the world?
The new Vietnam policy moved along several fronts. One was an effort to limit domestic opposition to the war. Aware that the military draft was one of the most visible targets of dissent, the administration devised a new "lottery” system,
hrough which only a limited group-those nineteen-year-olds vith low lottery numbers-would be subject to conscription, .ater, the president urged the creation of an all-volunteer rmy. By 1973, the Selective Service System was on its way to t least temporary extinction.
More important in stifling dissent, however, was the new >olicy of "Vietnamization” of the war—the training and equipping of the South Vietnamese military to take over the burden of combat from American forces. In the fall of 1969,
Consequences of
VlETNAMIZATION”
since the beginning of the war. The reductions continued steadily for more than three years. From a peak of more than 540,000 American troops in 1969, the number had dwindled to about 60,000 by 1972.
Vietnamization helped quiet domestic opposition to the war. But it did nothing to break the stalemate in the negotiations with the North Vietnamese in Paris. The new administration quickly decided that new military pressures would be necessary to do that.
Escalation
By the end of their first year in office, Nixon and Kissinger had concluded that the most effective way to tip the military balance in America's favor was to destroy the bases in Cambodia from which, the American military believed, the North Vietnamese were launching many of their attacks. Very early in his presidency, Nixon ordered the air force to begin bombing Cambodian territory to destroy the enemy sanctuaries. He kept the raids secret from Congress and the public. In the spring of 1970, possibly with U.S. encouragement and support, conservative military leaders overthrew the neutral government of Cambodia and established a new, pro-American regime under General Lon Nol. Lon Nol quickly gave his approval to American incursions into his territory; and on April 30, Nixon went on television to announce that he was ordering American troops across the border into Cambodia to "clean out” the bases that the enemy had been using for its "increased military aggression.”
Almost overnight, the Cambodian invasion restored the dwindling antiwar movement to vigorous life. The first days of May saw the most widespread and vocal antiwar demonstrations since the beginning of the war. Hundreds of thousands of protesters gathered in Washington, D.C., to denounce the president’s policies. Millions, perhaps, participated in other demonstrations on campuses nationwide. The mood of crisis intensified greatly on May 4, when four college students were killed and nine others injured when members of Kent State	National Guard opened fire on antiwar
demonstrators at Kent State University in
Ohio. Ten days later, police killed two black students at Jackson State University in Mississippi during a demonstration there.
The clamor against the war quickly spread into the government and the press. Congress angrily repealed the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution in December, stripping the president of what had long served as the legal basis for the war. Nixon ignored the action. Then, in June 1971, first the New York Times and later other newspapers began publishing excerpts from a secret study of the war prepared by the Defense Department during the Johnson administration. What came to be known as the Pentagon Papers, leaked to the press by former Defense Department official Daniel Ellsberg, provided evidence of what many critics of the war had long believed: that the government had been dishonest, both in reporting the military progress of the war and in explaining
Nixon announced reduction of American ground troops from
Vietnam by 60,000, the first reduction in U.S. troop strength
826 * CHAPTER 30
My Lai Massacre
its own motives for American involvement. The administra-
tion went to court to suppress the documents, but the
Supreme Court finally ruled that the press had the right to
publish them.
Morale and discipline were rapidly deteriorating among U.S. troops in Vietnam, who had been fighting a savage and inconclusive war for more than five years. The trial and conviction in 1971 of Lieutenant William Calley, who was charged with overseeing a massacre of more than 300 unarmed South
Vietnamese civilians, attracted wide public attention. Many Americans believed that the My Lai tragedy was not an isolated incident. Less publicized were other, more widespread problems among American troops in Vietnam: desertion, drug addiction, racial hostilities, refusal to obey orders, even the occasional killing of unpopular officers by enlisted men.
By 1971, nearly two-thirds of those interviewed in public opinion polls were urging American withdrawal from Vietnam, including many conservatives, who considered Nixon’s policies as too timid. If the war was not designed for victory, they believed, it should not be fought.
In March 1972, the North Vietnamese mounted the biggest offensive since 1968 (the so-called Easter offensive). American and South Vietnamese forces managed to halt the North Vietnam advance, but it was clear that without American support the offensive would have succeeded. At the same time, Nixon ordered American planes to bomb targets
near Hanoi, the capital of North Vietnam, and Haiphong, its principal port, and called for the mining of seven North Vietnamese harbors to stop the flow of supplies from China and the Soviet Union.
Easter
Offensive
"Peace with Honor"
As the 1972 presidential election approached, the administration stepped up its efforts to produce a breakthrough in negotiations with the North Vietnamese. In April 1972, the president dropped his longtime insistence on a removal of North Vietnamese troops from the south before any American withdrawal. Meanwhile, Henry Kissinger was meeting privately in Paris with the North Vietnamese foreign secretary, Le Due Tho, to work out terms for a cease-fire. On October 26, only days before the presidential election, Kissinger announced that "peace is at hand.” But several weeks later (after the election), negotiations broke down once again. The American and the North Vietnamese governments appeared ready to accept the Kissinger-Tho plan for a cease-fire, but the regime of General Nguyen Van Thieu balked, still insisting on a full withdrawal of North Vietnamese forces from the south. Kissinger tried to win additional concessions from the communists to meet Thieu’s objections, but on December 16 talks broke off.
The next day, December 17, American B-52s began the
heaviest and most destructive air raids of the entire war on
"Christmas
Bombing”
Hanoi, Haiphong, and other North Vietnamese targets. Civilian casualties were high, and fifteen American B-52s were shot down by the North Vietnamese; in the entire war to that point, the United States had lost only one of the giant bombers. On December 30, Nixon terminated the "Christmas bombing.” The United States and the North Vietnamese soon
returned to the conference table. And on January 27, 1973, they signed an "agreement on ending the war and restoring peace in Vietnam.” Nixon claimed that the Christmas bombing had forced the North Vietnamese to relent. At least equally important, however, was the enormous American pressure on Thieu to accept the cease-fire.
The terms of the Paris accords were little different from those Kissinger and Tho had accepted in principle a few months before. There would be an immediate cease-fire. The North Vietnamese would release several hundred American prisoners of war. The Thieu regime would survive for the moment-the principal North Vietnamese concession to the United States-but North Vietnamese forces already in the south would remain there. An undefined committee would work out a permanent settlement.
Defeat in Indochina
American forces were hardly out of Indochina before the Paris accords collapsed. During the first year after the ceasefire, the contending Vietnamese armies suffered greater battle losses than the Americans had absorbed during ten years of fighting. Finally, in March 1975, the North Vietnamese launched a full-scale offensive against the now greatly weakened forces of the south. Thieu appealed to
Fall of Washington for assistance; the president Saigon	(now Gerald Ford; Nixon had resigned in
1974) appealed to Congress for additional funding; Congress refused. Late in April 1975, communist forces marched into Saigon, shortly after officials of the Thieu regime and the staff of the American embassy had fled the country in humiliating disarray. Communist forces quickly occupied the capital, renamed it Ho Chi Minh City, and began the process of reuniting Vietnam under the Hanoi government. At about the same time, the Lon Nol regime in Cambodia fell to the murderous communists of Pol Pot and the Khmer Rouge—whose genocidal policies led to the deaths of more than a third of the country’s people over the next several years. That was the grim end of over a decade of direct American military involvement in Vietnam. More than 1.2 million Vietnamese soldiers had died in combat, along with countless civilians throughout the region. The United States paid a heavy price as well. The war had cost the nation almost $150 billion in direct costs and much more indirectly. It had resulted in the deaths of over 55,000 young Americans and the injury of 300,000 more. And the nation had suffered a heavy blow to its confidence and self-esteem.
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
• 827 NIXON, KISSINGER, AND
THE WORLD
The continuing war in Vietnam provided a dismal backdrop to what Nixon considered his larger mission in world affairs: the construction of a new international order. The president had become convinced that old assumptions of a "bipolar” world-in which the United States and the Soviet Union were the only truly great powers-were now obsolete. Instead, America must adapt to the new "multipolar” international structure, in which China, Japan, and Western Europe would become major, independent forces. "It will be a safer world and a
E EVACUATION OF SAIGON A
harried U.S. official struggles to keep panicking Vietnamese from ■ding an already-overburdened helicopter on the roof of the American embassy in Saigon. The hurried nation of Americans took place only hours before the arrival of North Vietnamese troops, agnalmg the final at of South Vietnam. (© AP Images) Toward a 'Multipolar” World
better world,” he said in 1971, "if we have a strong, healthy United States, Europe, Soviet Union, China, Japan-each balancing the other, not playing one against the other, an even balance.”
China and the Soviet Union
For more than twenty years, ever since the fall of Chiang Kai-shek in 1949, the United States had treated China, the second-largest nation on earth, as if it did not exist. Instead, America recognized the regime-in-exile on the island of Taiwan as the legitimate government of mainland China. Nixon and Kissinger wanted to forge a new relationship with the Chinese communists-in part to strengthen them as a counterbalance to the Soviet Union. The Chinese, for their part, were eager to forestall what they feared was the possibility of a Soviet-American alliance against China and to end China’s own isolation from the international arena.
In July 1971, Nixon sent Henry Kissinger on a secret mission to Beijing. When Kissinger returned, the president made the startling announcement that he would visit China within the next few months. That fall, with American approval, the United Nations admit-
ted the communist government of China and expelled the representatives of the Taiwan regime. Finally, in February 1972, Nixon paid a formal visit to China, which erased much of the deep American animosity toward the Chinese communists.
The initiatives in China coincided with (and probably assisted) an effort by the Nixon administration to improve relations with the Soviet Union. In 1969, American and Soviet diplomats met in Helsinki, Finland, to begin talks on limiting nuclear weapons. In 1972, SALT I	they Pr°duced the first Strategic
Arms Limitation Treaty (SALT I), which froze the nuclear missiles (ICBMs) of both sides at present levels.
Nixon’s China Visit
The Problems of Multipolarity
Nixon and Kissinger believed that great-power relationships could not alone ensure international stability, for the "Third World” remained the most volatile and dangerous source of international tension.
Central to the Nixon-Kissinger policy toward the Third World was the effort to maintain a stable status quo without involving the United States
Doctrine t0° deeP'y in local disputes. In 1969
°	and 1970, the president described what
became known as the Nixon Doctrine, by which the United States would "participate in the defense and development of allies and friends” but would leave the "basic
828 CHAPTER 30
NIXON IN CHINA
President Richard Nixon's 1972 visit to China was an important step in normalizing relations between the US and the People s Republic of China. Here Nixon toasts the developing relationship with Prime Minister Zhou Enlai. (© Universal Images Group/Getty Images) ^Six-Day War”
responsibility” for the future of those '"friends” to the nations themselves.
In the Middle East, conditions grew more volatile in the aftermath of the 1967 "Six-Day War,” in which Israel routed Egyptian, Syrian, and Jordanian forces, gained control of the whole of the long-divided city of Jerusalem, and occupied substantial new territories:
on the west bank of the Jordan River, the Gaza Strip, the Golan Heights, and elsewhere. The war also increased the number of refugee Palestinians-Arabs who claimed the lands now controlled by Israel and who, dislodged from their homes, became a source of considerable instability in Jordan, Lebanon, and the other surrounding countries into which they now moved.
In October 1973, on the Jewish High Holy Day of Yorn Kippur, Egyptian and Syrian forces again attacked Israel. For ten days, the Israelis struggled to recover from the surprise attack; finally, they launched an effective counteroffensive against Egyptian forces in the Sinai. At that point, the United States intervened, placing heavy pressure on Israel to accept a cease-fire rather than press its advantage.
The imposed settlement of the Yorn Kippur War demonstrated the growing dependence of the United States and its allies on Arab oil. Permitting Israel to continue its drive into Egypt
Arab Oil might have jeopardized the ability of the
Embargo United States to purchase needed petroleum from the Arab states. A brief but painful embargo by the Arab governments on the sale of oil to supporters of Israel (including America) in 1973 provided an ominous warning of the costs of losing access to the region’s resources.
the federal government and the interests of states and local communities. In the end, however, economic and political crises-some beyond the administration’s control, some of its own making-sharply limited Nixon’s ability to fulfill his domestic goals.
Domestic Initiatives
Dismantling the Great Society
Many of Nixon’s domestic policies were a response to what he believed to be the demands of his own constituency-conservative, middle-class people whom he liked to call the "silent majority” and who wanted to reduce federal "interference” in local affairs. Nixon tried, unsuccessfully, to persuade Congress to pass legislation prohib-
iting the use of forced busing to achieve school desegregation. He blocked the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare from cutting off federal funds from school districts that had failed to comply with court orders to integrate. At the same time, he began to reduce or dismantle many of the social programs of the Great Society and the New Frontier. In 1973, for example, he abolished the Office of Economic Opportunity, the centerpiece of the antipoverty program of the Johnson years.
Yet Nixon’s domestic efforts were not entirely conservative. One of the administration’s boldest efforts was an attempt to overhaul the nation’s enormous welfare system. Nixon proposed replacing the existing system, which almost everyone agreed was cumbersome, expensive, and inefficient, with what he called the Family Assistance Plan (FAP). It would in effect have created a guaranteed annual income for all Americans: $1,600 in federal grants, which could be supplemented by outside earnings up to $4,000. Even many liberals applauded the proposal as an important step toward expanding federal responsibility for the poor. Nixon, however, presented the plan in conservative terms: as something that would reduce the role of government and transfer to welfare recipients themselves daily responsibility for their own lives. Although the FAP won approval in the House in 1970, concerted attacks by welfare recipients (who considered the benefits inadequate), members of the welfare bureaucracy (whose own influence stood to be sharply diminished by the bill), and conservatives (who opposed a guaranteed income on principle) helped kill it in the Senate.
From the Warren Court
to the Nixon Court
Of all the liberal institutions that had aroused the enmity of the "silent majority” in the 1950s and 1960s, none had evoked more anger and bitterness than the Supreme Court. Not only had its rulings on racial matters disrupted traditional social patterns, but its staunch defense of civil liberties had, in the opinions of many Americans, contributed to the increase in crime, disorder, and moral decay. In Engel v. Vitale (1962), the Court ruled that prayers in public schools
POLITICS AND ECONOMICS UNDER NIXON
The Nixon administration described its policies as an
attempt to restore balance: between the needs of the poor
and the desires of the middle class, between the power of
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
» 829 violated the constitutional separation of church and state, sparking outrage among religious fundamentalists and others. In Roth v. United States (1957), the Court had sharply limited the authority of local governments to curb pornography. In Gideon v. Wainwright (1963), the Court ruled that every felony defendant was entitled to a lawyer regardless of his or her ability to pay. In Escobedo v. Illinois (1964), it ruled that a defendant must be allowed access to a lawyer before questioning by police. In Miranda v. Arizona (1966), the Court confirmed the obligation of authorities to inform a criminal suspect of his or her rights. By 1968, the Warren Court had become the target of Americans of all kinds who felt the balance of power in the United States had shifted too far toward the poor and dispossessed at the expense of the middle class, and toward criminals at the expense of law-abiding citizens.
One of the most important decisions of the Warren Court in the 1960s was Baker v. Carr (1962), which required state Baker v. Carr legislatures to apportion electoral districts so that all citizens' votes would have equal weight. In dozens of states, systems of legislative districting had given disproportionate representation to sparsely populated rural areas, hence diminishing the voting power of urban residents. The reapportionment that the decision required greatly strengthened the voting power of African Americans, Hispanics, and other groups concentrated
in cities.
Nixon was determined to use his judicial appointments to give the Court a more conservative cast. His first opportunity came almost as soon as he entered office. When Chief Justice Earl Warren resigned early in 1969, Nixon replaced him with a federal appeals court judge of conservative leanings, Warren Burger. A few months later, Associate Justice Abe Fortas resigned after allegations of financial improprieties. To replace him, Nixon named Clement F. Haynsworth, a respected federal circuit court judge from South Carolina. But Haynsworth came under fire from Senate liberals, black organizations, and labor unions for his conservative record on civil rights and for what some critics claimed was a conflict of interest in several of the cases on which he had sat. The Senate rejected him. Nixon’s next choice was G. Harrold Carswell, a judge of the Florida federal appeals court of little distinction and widely considered unfit for the Supreme Court. The Senate rejected his nomination too.
Nixon was careful thereafter to choose justices of standing within the legal community to fill vacancies on the Supreme Court: Harry Blackmun, a moderate jurist from Minnesota; Lewis F. Powell Jr., a respected judge from Virginia; and William Rehnquist, a member of the Nixon Justice Department.
The new Court, however, fell short of what many conservatives had expected. Rather than retreating from its commitment to social reform, the Court in many areas became more committed. In Swann v. Charlotte-Mecklenburg Board of Education (1971), it ruled in favor of the use of forced busing to achieve racial balance in schools. In Furman v. Georgia (1972), the Court overturned existing capital punishment
statutes and established strict new guidelines for such laws in the future. In Roe v. Wade (1973), it struck down laws forbidding abortions. In other decisions, however, the Burger
„	n	Court was more moderate. Although
Bakke v. Board .	, ,	,
of Regents of	iustices approved busing as a tool
California for achieving integration, they rejected, in Milliken v. Bradleg (1974), a plan to transfer students across district lines (in this case, between
Detroit and its suburbs) to achieve racial balance. While the Court upheld the principle of affirmative action in its celebrated 1978 decision Bakke v. Board of Regents of California, it established restrictive new guidelines for such programs in the future.
The Election of 1972
Nixon entered the presidential race in 1972 with a substantial reserve of strength. He had made significant achievements in foreign policy and in the de-escalation of the Vietnam War. His energetic reelection committee collected enormous sums of money to support the campaign. The president himself used the powers of incumbency with great effect, refraining from campaigning and concentrating on highly publicized international decisions and state visits. Agencies of the federal government dispensed funds and favors to strengthen Nixon’s political standing in critical areas.
Nixon was most fortunate in 1972, however, in his opposition. The return of George Wallace to the presidential fray caused some early concern. Nixon was delighted to see Wallace run in the Democratic primaries and quietly encouraged him to do so. But he feared that Wallace would again launch a third-party campaign. The possibility of such a campaign vanished in May, when a would-be assassin shot the Alabama governor during a campaign rally in Maryland. Paralyzed from the waist down, Wallace was unable to continue campaigning.
The Democrats, in the meantime, were making their own
George	contributions to the Nixon cause by nom-
McGovern inating for president a representative of their most liberal wing: Senator George S.
McGovern of South Dakota. An outspoken critic of the war, a forceful advocate of advanced liberal positions on most social and economic issues, McGovern seemed to embody many aspects of the turbulent 1960s that middle-class Americans were most eager to reject. McGovern profited greatly from party reforms (which he had helped to draft) that reduced the power of party leaders and gave increased
influence to inexperienced delegates in the selection of the Democratic ticket. But those same reforms helped make the Democratic Convention of 1972 an unappealing spectacle to much of the public.
On election day, Nixon won reelection Nixon’s by one of the iargest margins in history: Landslide 6q ? percent of the popular vote compared fith 37.5 percent for the forlorn McGovern, and an electoral
aargin of 520 to 17.
DEBATING THE PAST
MM
Watergate
Tl DPA Tt T? C a^ter Watergate—one of the most famous political scandals in IJ JD w tt O JD w American history—historians and others continue to argue about its causes and significance. Their interpretations fall into several broad categories.
One argument emphasizes the evolution of the institution of the presidency over time and sees Watergate as the result of a much larger pattern of presidential usurpations of power that stretched back at least several decades. Arthur Schlesinger Jr. helped develop this argument in his 1973 book, The Imperial Presidency, which argues that ever since World War II, Americans have believed that the nation was in a state of permanent crisis, threatened from abroad by the menace of communism, threatened from within by the danger of insufficient will. The belief of a succession of presidents in the urgency of this crisis, and in their duty to take whatever measures might be necessary to combat it, led them gradually to usurp more and more power from Congress, the courts, and the public. Initially, this expansion of presidential power came in the realm of international affairs: covert and at times illegal activities overseas.
But in the postwar world, domestic politics began to seem inseparable from international politics. Gradually, presidents began to look for ways to circumvent constraints in domestic matters as well. Nixon's actions in the Watergate crisis were, in other words, a culmination of this long and steady expansion of covert presidential power. Jonathan Schell, in The Time of Illusion (1975), offers a variation of this argument, tying the crisis of the presidency to the pressure that nuclear weapons place on presidents to protect the nation's—and their own—"credibility.'' Other commentators (but few serious historical studies) go even further and argue that what happened to produce the Watergate
scandals was not substantively different from the normal patterns of presidential behavior, that Nixon simply got caught where other presidents had not, and that a long-standing liberal hostility toward Nixon ensured that he would pay a higher price for his behavior than other presidents would.
A second explanation of Watergate emphasizes the difficult social and political environment of the late 1960s and early 1970s. Nixon entered office, according to this view, facing an unprecedentedly radical opposition that would stop at nothing to discredit the war and destroy his authority. He found himself, therefore, drawn into taking similarly desperate measures of his own to defend himself from these extraordinary challenges. Nixon made this argument in his own 1975 memoirs:
It was this epidemic of unprecedented domestic terrorism that prompted our efforts to discover the best means by which to deal with this new phenomenon of highly organized and highly skilled revolutionaries
The Troubled Economy
For three decades, the American economy had been the envy of the world. It had produced as much as a third of the world’s industrial goods and had dominated international trade. The American dollar had been the strongest currency in the world, and the American standard of living had risen steadily from its already substantial heights. Many Americans assumed that this remarkable prosperity was the normal condition of their society. In fact, however, it rested in part on several advantages that were rapidly disappearing by the late 1960s: above all, the absence of significant foreign competition and easy access to raw materials in the Third World.
Inflation, which had been creeping upward for several years when Richard Nixon took office, soon began to soar; it would be the most disturbing economic problem of the 1970s. Its most visible cause was a significant increase in federal deficit spending that began in the 1960s, when the
Inflation Johnson administration tried to fund the war in Vietnam and its ambitious social programs without raising taxes. But there were other, equally important causes. No longer did the United States have exclusive access to cheap raw materials around the globe; not only were other industrial nations now competing for increasingly
830 •
scarce raw materials, but Third World suppliers of those materials were beginning to realize their value and to demand higher prices for them.
Annual percentage change in Consumer Price Index
INFLATION, 1960-2010 Inflation was the biggest economic worry of most Americans in e 1970s and early 1980s, and this chart shows why. Having remained very low through the early 1960s, inflation rose slowly in the second half of the decade and then dramatically in the
mi - and late 1970sTefore beginning a long and steady decline in the early 1980s.
* What caused the great spike in inflation in the 1970s?
NIXON QUITS
Tourists outside the White House learn that Nixon will likely resign the presidency the next day: August 9, 1974. (© Bettmann/ Corbis) UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	For scholars who cite social and institutional forces as explanations for Watergate, what are these forces? How did they contribute to the Watergate scandal?
2.	Many scholars see Nixon as the party most responsible for Watergate. How did Nixon's personality contribute to both his rise to power as president and his downfall as a result of Watergate? Did Nixon's resignation permanently damage the public's trust in the presidency?
3.	What have been the lasting effects of Watergate on people's perception of the presidency and the government?
dedicated to the violent destruction of our democratic system * The historian Herbert Parmet echoes parts of this argument in Richard Nixon and His America (1990), Stephen Ambrose offers a more muted version of the same view in Richard Nixon (1989).
Most of those who have written about Watergate, however, search for the explanation not in institutional or social forces, but in the personalities of the people involved and, most notably, in the personality of Richard Nixon. Even many of those who have developed structural explana-
tions (Schlesinger, Schell, and Ambrose, for example) return eventually to Nixon himself as the most important explanation for Watergate. Others begin there, perhaps most notably Stanley I. Kutler, in The Wars of Watergate (1990) and, later, Abuse of Power (1997), in which he presents extensive excerpts from conversations about Watergate taped in the Nixon White House. Kutler emphasizes Nixon’s lifelong resort to vicious political tactics and his long-standing belief that he was a special target of unscrupulous enemies and had to "get" them before they got him. Watergate was rooted, Kutler argues, "in the personality and history of Nixon himself." A "corrosive hatred," he claims, "decisively shaped Nixon's own behavior, his career, and eventually his historical standing." •
RN:
The Memoirs of Richard Nixon (New York: Grosset & Dunlap, 1978). Copyright © 1978 by Richard Nixon. The greatest immediate blow to the American economy was the increasing cost of energy. More than any nation on earth, the United States based its economy on the easy availability of cheap and plentiful fossil fuels. Domestic petroleum reserves were no longer sufficient to meet this demand, and the nation was heavily dependent on imports from the Middle East and Africa.
For many years, the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) had operated as an informal bargaining unit OPEC	for the sale of oil by Third World nations,
but had seldom managed to exercise any real strength. But in the early 1970s, OPEC began to use its oil as both an economic tool and a political weapon. In 1973, in the midst of the Yorn Kippur War, Arab members of OPEC announced that they would no longer ship petroleum to nations supporting Israel-which meant the United States and its allies in Western Europe. At about the same time, the OPEC nations agreed to raise their prices by 400 percent. These twin shocks produced momentary economic chaos in the West. The United States suffered its first fuel shortage since World War II. And although the boycott ended a few months later, the price of energy continued to skyrocket both because of OPEC s new militant policies and because of the weakening competi-
tive position of the dollar in world markets.
But inflation was only one of the new problems facing the U.S. economy. Another was the decline of the nation’s manufacturing sector. American industry had flourished in the after-math of World War II. By the 1970s, however, the climate for American manufacturing had changed significantly. Many of the great industrial plants were now many decades old, much less efficient than the newer plants that Japan and European industrial nations had constructed after the war. In some industries (notably steel and automobiles), management had become complacent and bureaucratic. Most important, American manufacturing now faced major competition from abroad-not only in world trade (which still constituted only a small part of the U.S. economy) but also at home. Automobiles, steel, and many other manufactured goods from Japan and Europe established major footholds in the U.S. markets. Some of America’s new competitors benefited from lower labor costs than their U.S. counterparts.
Thus the 1970s marked the beginning of a long, painful
process of deindustrialization, during which thousands of
_	factories across the country closed
Deindustrialization	j ..	/	.
their gates and millions of workers lost their jobs. New employment opportunities were becoming available in other, growing areas of the economy: technology, information systems, and many other "knowledge-based”
832 ® CHAPTER 30
industries that would ultimately drive an extraordinary (if unbalanced) economic revival in the 1980s and 1990s. But many industrial workers were poorly equipped to move into those jobs. The result was a growing pool of unemployed and underemployed workers; the virtual disappearance of industrial jobs from many inner cities, where large numbers of minorities lived; and the impoverishment of communities dependent on particular industries. Some of the nation's manufacturing sectors ultimately revived, but few regained the size and dominance they had enjoyed in the 1950s and 1960s.
Inequality
Inequality in income and wealth is a characteristic of every nation; but in the last four decades, that inequality has become dramatically more unequal in the United States. From the end of World War II to the middle of the 1970s, increases in incomes (and, to a lesser extent, increases in total wealth) grew at about the same rate across the range of incomes. People in the bottom 20 percent of the income scale saw their incomes increase at about the same rate that people in the top 20 percent of the income scale did. But beginning in about 1973, that pattern began to change dramatically. The top 20 percent of earners saw their incomes rise at a much higher rate than did the earners below them. The top 5 percent did even better. And the top 1 percent did far better still-earning 24 percent of total income. At the same time, people in the bottom 20 percent saw their incomes slowly decrease, while the middle-class earners saw their earnings remain relatively stagnant, with incomes rising at about the same rate as inflation.
There are many explanations for this growing inequality. The decline of industry in the United States has pushed many once-well-paid workers into much-lower-paid nonunion jobs. Income tax reductions have increased the incomes of the wealthiest Americans much more rapidly than they have increased the incomes of lower-income people. The growth of the financial sector, and the extraordinary wealth that many financiers have accumulated in recent decades, has helped concentrate income and wealth at the top in unprecedented ways. Whether this inequality is a danger to American democracy, as many people believe, or a product of economic success that has improved, or will improve, the lot of everyone, as many others believe, it is nevertheless the case that the incomes in the United States are far more unequal today than they were a generation or more ago.
The Nixon Response
The Nixon administration responded to these mounting economic problems by focusing on the one thing it thought it could control: inflation. Placing conservative economists at the head of the Federal Reserve Board, he ensured sharply higher interest rates and a contraction of the money supply. But the tight money policy did little to curb inflation: the
cost of living rose a cumulative 15 percent during Nixon’s first two and a half years in office. Economic growth, in the mean-
„ time, declined. The United States was Stagflation encountering a new and puzzling dilemma: "stagflation,” a combination of rising prices and general economic stagnation.
In the summer of 1971, Nixon imposed a ninety-day freeze on all wages and prices at their existing levels. Then, in November, he launched what he called Phase II of his economic plan: mandatory guidelines for wage and price increases, to be administered by a federal agency. Inflation subsided temporarily, but the recession continued. Fearful that the recession would be more damaging than inflation in an election year, the administration reversed itself late in 1971: interest rates were allowed to drop sharply, and government spending grew. The new tactics helped revive the economy in the short term, but inflation rose substantially-particularly after the administration abandoned the strict Phase II controls.
In 1973, prices rose 9 percent; in 1974, after the Arab oil embargo and the OPEC price increases, they rose 12 percent-the highest rate since the relaxation of price controls shortly after World War II. The value of the dollar continued to slide, and the nation’s international trade continued to decline.
THE WATERGATE CRISIS
Although economic problems greatly concerned the American people in the 1970s, another stunning development almost entirely preoccupied the nation beginning early in 1973: the fall of Richard Nixon.
The Scandals
Nixon’s crisis was in part a result of long-term changes in the presidency. Public expectations of the president had increased yHE	dramatically in the years since World War
Changing	Vet t^ie constraints placed on the author-
Presidency ity °f the office had grown as well. In response, a succession of presidents had sought new methods for the exercise of power, often stretching the law, occasionally breaking it. Nixon greatly accelerated these trends. Facing a Democratic Congress hostile to his goals, he attempted to find ways to circumvent the legislature whenever possible. Saddled with a federal bureaucracy unresponsive to his wishes, he constructed a hierarchy in which virtually all executive power became concentrated in the White House. Operating within a rigid, even autocratic staff structure, the president became a solitary, at times brooding figure. Unknown to all but a few intimates, he also became mired in a pattern of illegalities and abuses of power that in late 1972 began to
break through to the surface.
Early on the morning of June 17, 1972, police arrested five men who had broken into the offices of the Democratic National Committee in the Watergate office building in
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY . 833
The	Washington, D.C. Two others were seized
^Bre/hc-In15	a Sh°rt time later and charged with super-
vising the break-in. When reporters for the Washington Post began researching the backgrounds of the culprits, they discovered that among those involved in the burglary were former employees of the Committee for the Re-election of the President. One of them had worked in the White House. Moreover, they had been paid to execute the break-in from a secret fund of the reelection committee, a fund controlled by members of the White
House staff.
Public interest in the disclosures grew slowly in the last months of 1972. Early in 1973, however, the Watergate burglars went on trial; and under relentless prodding from federal judge John J. Sirica, one of the defendants, James W. McCord, agreed to cooperate both with the grand jury and with a special Senate investigating committee. McCord’s testimony opened a floodgate of confessions, and for months a parade of White House and campaign officials exposed one illegality after another. Foremost among them was a member of the inner circle of the White House, counsel to the president John Dean, who leveled allegations against Nixon himself.
Two different sets of scandals emerged from the investigations. One was a general pattern of abuses of power involving both the White House and the Nixon campaign committee, which included, but was not limited to, the Watergate break-in. The other scandal,
and the one that became the major focus of public attention for nearly two years, was the way in which the administration tried to manage the investigations of the Watergate break-in and other abuses-a pattern of behavior that became known as the "cover-up.” There was never any conclusive evidence that the president had planned or approved the Watergate burglary in advance. But there was evidence that he had been involved in illegal efforts to obstruct investigations and withhold information. Testimony before the Senate provided evidence of the complicity of Dean, Attorney General John Mitchell, top White House assistants H. R. Haldeman and John Ehrlichman, and others. As interest in the case grew to some-
"Cover-Up”
thing approaching a national obsession, the investigation focused increasingly on a single question: in the words of Senator Howard Baker of Tennessee, "What did the President know and when did he know it?”
Nixon accepted the departure of those members of his administration implicated in the scandals. But he continued to insist that he himself was innocent. There the matter might have rested, had it not been for the disclosure during the Senate hearings of a White House taping system that had recorded virtually every conversation in the president s office during the period in question. All the groups investigating the scandals sought access to the tapes; Nixon, pleading executive privilege,” refused to release them. A special prosecutor appointed by the president to handle the Watergate cases, Harvard law professor Archibald Cox, took Nixon to court in October 1973 in an effort to force him to relinquish the recordings. Nixon fired Cox and suffered the humiliation of watching
^Saturday
Night
Massacre”
both Attorney General Elliot Richardson and his deputy resign in protest. This "Saturday night massacre” made the president’s predicament infinitely worse. Not only did public pressure force him to appoint a new special prosecutor, Texas attorney Leon Jaworski, who proved just as determined as Cox to subpoena the tapes; but the episode also pre-
cipitated an investigation by the House of Representatives into the possibility of impeachment.
The Fall of Richard Nixon
Nixon’s situation deteriorated further in the following months. Late in 1973, Vice President Spiro Agnew became embroiled in a scandal of his own when evidence surfaced that he had accepted bribes and kickbacks while serving as governor of Maryland and even as vice president. In return for a Justice Department agreement not to press the case, Agnew pleaded no contest to a lesser charge of income-tax evasion and resigned from the government. With the controversial Agnew no longer in line to succeed to the presidency, the prospect of removing Nixon from the White House became less worrisome to his opponents. The new vice president (the first appointed under the terms of the Twenty-Fifth Amendment, which had been adopted in 1967) was House Minority Leader Gerald Ford, an amiable and popular Michigan congressman.
In April 1974, in an effort to head off further subpoenas of the tapes, the president released transcripts of a number of relevant conversations, claiming that they proved his innocence. But even these edited tapes seemed to suggest Nixon’s complicity in the cover-up. In July, the crisis reached a climax. First the Supreme Court ruled unanimously, in United States v. Richard M. Nixon, that the president must
relinquish the tapes to Special Prosecutor Jaworski. Days later, the House Judiciary Committee voted to recommend three articles of impeachment, charging that Nixon had, first, obstructed justice in the Watergate cover-up; second, misused federal agencies to violate the rights of citizens; and third, defied the authority of Congress by refusing to deliver tapes and other materials subpoenaed by the committee.
Even without additional evidence, Nixon might well have been impeached by the full House and convicted by the Senate. Early in August, however, he provided at last what many wavering members of Congress had begun to call the "smoking gun.” Among the tapes that the Supreme Court compelled Nixon to relinquish were several that offered apparently incontrovertible evidence of his involvement in the Watergate cover-up. Only days after the burglary, the recordings disclosed, the president had ordered the FBI to stop investigating the break-in. Impeachment and conviction now seemed inevitable.
For several days, Nixon brooded in the White House. Finally, on August 8, 1974, he announced his resignation-the first president in American history ever to
Nixon Resigns do SQ At noon the next while Nixon
U.S. v. Richard M. Nixon
834
* CHAPTER 30
i
i
NIXON’S FAREWELL
Only moments before, Nixon had been in tears saying good-bye to his staff in the East Room of the White House. But as he boarded a helicopter to begin his trip home to California shortly after resigning as president, he flashed his trademark "victory" sign to the crowd on the White House lawn. (© Bettmann/Corbis) and his family were flying west to their home in California, Gerald Ford took the oath of office as president.
Many Americans expressed relief and exhilaration that, as the new president put it, wOur long national nightmare is over.” But the wave of good feeling could not obscure the
deeper and more lasting damage of the Watergate crisis. In a society in which distrust of leaders and institutions of authority was already widespread, the fall of Richard Nixon seemed to confirm the most cynical assumptions about the character of American public life.
LOOKING BACK
The victory of Richard Nixon in the 1968 presidential election represented a popular repudiation of turbulence and radicalism. It was a call for a restoration of order and stability. But order and stability were not the dominant characteristics of Nixon’s troubled years in office. He entered office, rather, when the forces of the left and the counterculture were approaching the peak of their influence. American culture and society in the late 1960s and early 1970s were shaped decisively by, and were deeply divided over, the challenges of young people to the norms by which most Americans had lived. Also in those years, a host of new liberation movements
joined the drive for racial equality, and women mobilized effectively and powerfully to demand changes in the way their society treated gender differences.
Nixon had run for office attacking the failure of his predecessor to end the war in Vietnam. But during the first four years of his presidency, the war-and the protests against it continued and even in some respects escalated. The division of opinion over the war was as deep as any of the many other divisions in national life. It continued to poison the nation’s politics and social fabric until the American role in the conflict finally shuddered to a close in 1973.
THE CRISIS OF AUTHORITY
« 835 But much of the controversy and division in the 1970s was a product of the Nixon presidency itself Nixon was in many ways a dynamic and even visionary leader, who proposed (but rarely succeeded in enacting) some important domestic reforms and who made important changes in American foreign policy, most notably making overtures to communist China and forging detente with the Soviet Union. He was also, however, a devious and secretive man whose White House staff became engaged in a series of covert activities— many of them connected with the president’s reelection campaign in 1972-that produced the most dramatic political scandal in American history. Watergate, as it was called, preoccupied much of the nation for nearly two years beginning
in 1972; and ultimately, in the summer of 1974, the scandal forced Richard Nixon-who had been reelected to office only two years before by one of the largest majorities in modern history-to become the first president in American history to resign. He was a victim in part of the passions and divisions of his time and of the Vietnam War, which he had inherited but had not been able to end quickly. He was a victim as well of his own insecurities and resentments. Whatever the causes of his fall, however, the greatest cost of Watergate was not what it did to Nixon himself, but how it damaged the faith of the American people in their leaders and their government. That faith would remain weak through the remainder of the century and beyond.
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
American Indian Movement (AIM) 815
Betty Friedan 819 Cesar Chavez 816 Counterculture 811 "Don’t ask, don’t tell” 818 Free Speech Movement 809 George McGovern 829 Gerald Ford 833
Henry Kissinger 824 National Organization for
Women (NOW) 819 New Left 808 Nixon Doctrine 827 OPEC 831 Rachel Carson 822 Roe v. Wade 821 "Silent majority” 828
Spiro Agnew 833 "Stagflation” 832 Stonewall riot 817 Students for a Democratic
Society (SDS) 809 VlETNAMIZATION 824 Watergate 832 Weathermen 810 Wounded Knee 815
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	What was the New Left? How was it related to the counterculture?
2.	How did ethnic minorities, especially Native Americans and Latinos, challenge the status quo in the 1970s?
3.	What were the objectives of the new feminism of the 1970s? What gains did women achieve in this era? What setbacks did the feminist movement experience?
4.	What was the Nixon Doctrine? How did this doctrine play out in foreign policy?
5.	What was the effect of Nixon’s policies on the U.S. economy? What was Nixon’s response to escalating economic difficulties?
836 ® CHAPTER 30
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
1962
Students for a Democratic Society formed at Port Huron, Michigan
1964
Free Speech Movement begins at UC Berkeley
1963
Betty Friedan publishes The Feminine Mystique
1966
National Organization for Women (NOW) formed
Antiwar protesters march on Pentagon
1973
Paris accords produce cease-fire; the United States withdraws from Vietnam
Arab oil embargo produces first American energy crisis
Supreme Court decides Roe v. Wade
Indians demonstrate at Wounded Knee
1972
Nixon visits China SALT I signed
Burglary interrupted in
Watergate office building Nixon reelected president
1969
Antiwar movement stages Vietnam "moratorium"
"Stonewall Riot" in New York City launches gay liberation movement
400,000 people attend rock concert in Woodstock, NY.
1968
Campus riots break out at Columbia University and elsewhere
American Indian Movement (AIM) launched
1970
Students killed at Kent State and Jackson State Universities
1975
South Vietnam falls
1978
Supreme Court hands down Bakke decision
1971
Pentagon Papers published
Nixon imposes wage-price freeze and controls
J974..
Impeachment proceedings begin against Nixon
Vice President Spiro Agnew resigns; Gerald Ford appointed
to replace him
Nixon resigns; Ford becomes president
President Carter pardons Vietnam draft resisters
1982
Equal Rights Amendment fails to be ratified
Q4 FROM THE “AGE
j| OF LIMITS” TO THE AGE OF REAGAN
RONALD AND NANCY REAGAN
The president and the first lady greet guests at a White House social event. Nancy Reagan was most visible in her efforts to make the White House, and her husband’s presidency, seem more glamorous than those of most recent administrations. But she also played an important, if quiet, policy role in the administration. (Photo by Dirck Halstead/© Time & Life Pictures/Getty Images)
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What economic and energy problems plagued the presidencies of Gerald Ford and Jimmy Carter? How did Ford and Carter attempt to deal with these problems?
2.	What was the "New Right," and what effect did its rise have on American politics?
3.	What was Reaganomics, and how did this policy affect the national economy?
SETTING THE STAGE
THE FRUSTRATIONS OF THE EARLY 1970S—THE DEFEAT IN VIETNAM,
the Watergate crisis, economic difficulties—seriously damaged the confident nationalism and liberalism that had characterized so much of the postwar era. Many Americans began to wonder whether the age of a growing economy and growing expectations was giving way to a new "age of limits, in which America would have to learn to survive with less of everything—money, energy, opportunities, global power—and thus would have to accept constricted expectations.
At the end of the decade, however, the idea of an "age of limits met a powerful and ultimately decisive challenge that combined a conservative rejection of some of the heady visions of the 1960s with a reinforced commitment to economic growth, international power, and American virtue. Throughout the 1970s, a powerful, grassroots conservative movement grew rapidly in many parts of the United States, bringing together those who wanted a more conservative economic policy and those who were concerned about such cultural questions as religion and sexuality.
The most potent symbol of this growing movement was Ronald Reagan, who was elected president in 1980 and who, for the next eight years, became a symbol of a new kind of confident conservatism that would soon have enormous influence in the United States and in many other parts of the world. Reagan's personal popularity was an important part of his success, but so was an impressive economic revival that helped win support for his ideas.
POLITICS AND DIPLOMACY AFTER WATERGATE
In the aftermath of Richard Nixon’s departure from office, many Americans wondered whether trust in the presidency, and in the government as a whole, could easily be restored. The administrations of the two presidents who succeeded Nixon tried to answer those questions.
The Ford Custodianship
Gerald Ford inherited the presidency under unenviable circumstances. He had to try to rebuild confidence in government after the Watergate scandals and to restore economic prosperity in the midst of difficult domestic and international conditions.
The new president’s effort to establish himself as a symbol of political integrity suffered a set-Nixon	back only a month after he took office, when he granted Richard Nixon "a full,
Pardoned	free> and absolute pardon” for any crimes he may have committed during his
presidency. Much of the public suspected a secret deal with the former president.
The pardon caused a decline in Ford’s popularity from which he never fully recovered.
The Ford administration enjoyed less success in its effort to solve the problems of the American economy. In his efforts to curb inflation, the president rejected the idea of wage and price controls and called instead for largely ineffective voluntary efforts. Ford had to deal with a serious recession in 1974 and 1975-a task made more difficult by the continuing energy crisis. In the aftermath of the Arab oil embargo of 1973, the OPEC cartel began to raise the price of oil-by 400 percent in 1974 alone, one of the principal reasons why inflation reached 11 percent in 1976.
Ford retained Henry Kissinger as secretary of state and continued the policies of the Nixon Ford’s	years-Late in 1974>Ford met with Soviet premier Leonid Brezhnev at Vladivostok
Diplomatic	in Siberia and signed an arms control accord that was to serve as the basis for
Successes	SALT II, thus achieving a goal the Nixon administration had long sought.
Meanwhile, in the Middle East, Henry Kissinger helped produce a new accord,
by which Israel agreed to return large portions of the occupied Sinai to Egypt.
Ford’s policies came under attack from both the right and the left. In the 1976 Republican
primary campaign, Ford faced a powerful challenge from former California governor Ronald Reagan
leader of the party’s conservative wing. He spoke for many on the right who were unhappy with
any conciliation of communists. The president only barely survived the assault to win his party’s
838 >
FROM THE “AGE OF LIMITS” TO THE AGE OF REAGAN
« 839 Candidate (Party)	Electoral Vote	Popular Vote (%)
Jimmy Carter	297	40,828,587
(Democratic)		(50.0)
Gerald R. Ford	240	39,147,613
(Republican)		(47.9)
Ronald Reagan (Independent Republican)	1	—
Other candidates		1,575,459
(McCarthy [Ind.],		(2.1)
Libertarian)
53.5% of electorate voting
THE ELECTION OF 1976
Jimmy Carter, a former governor of Georgia, swept the South in the 1976 election and carried enough of the industrial states of the Northeast and Midwest to win a narrow victory over President Gerald R. Ford. His showing indicated the importance to the Democratic Party of having a candidate capable of attracting support in the South, which was becoming increasingly Republican by the 1970s. • What drove so many southerners into the Republican Party?
nomination. The Democrats, in the meantime, were gradually uniting behind a new and, before 1976, little-known candidate: Jimmy Carter, a former governor of Georgia who organized a brilliant primary campaign by offering honesty, piety, and an outsider’s skepticism of the federal government. And while Carter’s mammoth lead in opinion polls dwindled by election day, unhappiness with the economy and a general disenchantment with Ford enabled the Democrat to hold on for a narrow victory. Carter emerged with 50 percent of the popular vote to Ford’s 47.9 percent and 297 electoral votes to Ford’s 240.
The Trials of Jimmy Carter
Like Ford, Jimmy Carter assumed the presidency at a moment when the nation faced problems of staggering complexity and difficulty.
Carter had campaigned for the presidency as an "outsider,’’ representing Americans suspicious of entrenched bureaucracies and complacent public officials. He sur-
Carter’s Lack rOunded himself in the White House with a of Direction group of close_knit associates from Georgia.
Carter was exceptionally intelligent, but his critics charged that he provided no overall vision or direction to his government. His ambitious legislative agenda included major reforms of the tax and welfare systems; Congress passed virtually none of it.
Carter devoted much of his time to the problems of energy and the economy. Entering office in the midst of a recession, he moved first to reduce unemployment by raising public spending and cutting federal taxes. Unemployment declined, but inflation soared-largely because of the continuing increases in energy prices imposed on the West by OPEC. During Carter’s High Interest ^ast two Years in °ffice> oil prices rose at well Rates	over a 10 percent annual rate. Like Nixon
and Ford before him, Carter responded with a combination of tight money and calls for voluntary restraint. By 1980, interest rates had risen to the highest levels in American
history; at times, they exceeded 20 percent.
CARTER IN THE WHITE HOUSE
